Illinois, session 104th, SB1695.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-74.4-9 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-9)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-9)7    Sec. 11-74.4-9. Equalized assessed value of property.8    (a) Except as provided in subsection (a-5), if If a 9municipality by ordinance provides for tax increment 10allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8, the county 11clerk immediately thereafter shall determine (1) the most 12recently ascertained equalized assessed value of each lot, 13block, tract or parcel of real property within such 14redevelopment project area from which shall be deducted the 15homestead exemptions under Article 15 of the Property Tax 16Code, which value shall be the "initial equalized assessed 17value" of each such piece of property, and (2) the total 18equalized assessed value of all taxable real property within 19such redevelopment project area by adding together the most 20recently ascertained equalized assessed value of each taxable 21lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property within such 22project area, from which shall be deducted the homestead 23exemptions provided by Sections 15-170, 15-175, and 15-176 of   SB1695- 2 -LRB104 11432 RTM 21520 b1the Property Tax Code, and shall certify such amount as the 2"total initial equalized assessed value" of the taxable real 3property within such project area.4    (a-5) If the county clerk determines that any lot, block, 5tract, or parcel of real property within a redevelopment 6project area is not taxable or has an initial equalized 7assessed value of $0 as determined in subsection (a), then the 8fair market value of the lot, block, tract, or parcel shall be 9instead determined by a written MAI-certified appraisal or by 10a written certified appraisal of a State-certified or 11State-licensed real estate appraiser. The appraisal shall be 12available for public inspection no later than 90 days after 13the date that the ordinance for tax increment allocation 14financing under Section 11-74.4-8 was adopted by the 15municipality. The appraiser's conclusion of fair market value 16shall be converted by the county clerk to an assessed value 17using the appropriate level of assessment and then equalized 18by using the most recent equalization factor. The county clerk 19shall use the resulting figure as the initial equalized 20assessed value of the lot, block, tract, or parcel and shall 21add this initial equalized assessed value to the total initial 22equalized assessed value of the taxable real property within 23the redevelopment project area. For purposes of paragraphs (b) 24and (c), the lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property 25shall be considered taxable real property. This subsection 26applies only to ordinances adopted on or after the effective   SB1695- 3 -LRB104 11432 RTM 21520 b1date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 2    (b) In reference to any municipality which has adopted tax 3increment financing after January 1, 1978, and in respect to 4which the county clerk has certified the "total initial 5equalized assessed value" of the property in the redevelopment 6area, the municipality may thereafter request the clerk in 7writing to adjust the initial equalized value of all taxable 8real property within the redevelopment project area by 9deducting therefrom the exemptions under Article 15 of the 10Property Tax Code applicable to each lot, block, tract or 11parcel of real property within such redevelopment project 12area. The county clerk shall immediately after the written 13request to adjust the total initial equalized value is 14received determine the total homestead exemptions in the 15redevelopment project area provided by Sections 15-170, 1615-175, and 15-176 of the Property Tax Code by adding together 17the homestead exemptions provided by said Sections on each 18lot, block, tract or parcel of real property within such 19redevelopment project area and then shall deduct the total of 20said exemptions from the total initial equalized assessed 21value. The county clerk shall then promptly certify such 22amount as the "total initial equalized assessed value as 23adjusted" of the taxable real property within such 24redevelopment project area.25    (c) After the county clerk has certified the "total 26initial equalized assessed value" of the taxable real property   SB1695- 4 -LRB104 11432 RTM 21520 b1in such area, then in respect to every taxing district 2containing a redevelopment project area, the county clerk or 3any other official required by law to ascertain the amount of 4the equalized assessed value of all taxable property within 5such district for the purpose of computing the rate per cent of 6tax to be extended upon taxable property within such district, 7shall in every year that tax increment allocation financing is 8in effect ascertain the amount of value of taxable property in 9a redevelopment project area by including in such amount the 10lower of the current equalized assessed value or the certified 11"total initial equalized assessed value" of all taxable real 12property in such area, except that after he has certified the 13"total initial equalized assessed value as adjusted" he shall 14in the year of said certification if tax rates have not been 15extended and in every year thereafter that tax increment 16allocation financing is in effect ascertain the amount of 17value of taxable property in a redevelopment project area by 18including in such amount the lower of the current equalized 19assessed value or the certified "total initial equalized 20assessed value as adjusted" of all taxable real property in 21such area. The rate per cent of tax determined shall be 22extended to the current equalized assessed value of all 23property in the redevelopment project area in the same manner 24as the rate per cent of tax is extended to all other taxable 25property in the taxing district. The method of extending taxes 26established under this Section shall terminate when the   SB1695- 5 -LRB104 11432 RTM 21520 b1municipality adopts an ordinance dissolving the special tax 2allocation fund for the redevelopment project area. This 3Division shall not be construed as relieving property owners 4within a redevelopment project area from paying a uniform rate 5of taxes upon the current equalized assessed value of their 6taxable property as provided in the Property Tax Code.7(Source: P.A. 95-644, eff. 10-12-07.)